Utah statutes.
7-9-37.   Transfer of members of dissolved, merged, consolidated, transferred, or acquired credit union.

Members of a dissolved, merged, consolidated, transferred, or acquired credit union may become members of another existing credit union with a related field of membership as approved by the commissioner.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2003 General Session

